Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 2. Sentencing, Treatment, and Supervision

§ 3271.
Indeterminate life sentence.

A person who commits one of the following offenses shall be sentenced under this section:

Lewd and lascivious conduct with a child, second or subsequent offense, in violation of subdivision 2602(b)(2) of this title.

Sexual assault in violation of subsection 3252(a), (b), (d), or (e) of this title.

Aggravated sexual assault in violation of section 3253 of this title.

Violation of sex offender registry requirements by noncompliant high-risk sex offenders, in violation of subsection 5411d(g) of this title.

If a person is sentenced under this section, the person’s maximum sentence shall be imprisonment for life.

If a person sentenced under this section receives a sentence that is wholly or partially suspended, sex offender conditions and treatment shall be a condition of the person’s probation agreement.

If a person sentenced under this section receives a sentence for an unsuspended term of incarceration, the person shall not be released until the person successfully completes all sex offender treatment and programming required by the Department of Corrections, unless the Department determines that the person poses a sufficiently low risk of reoffense to protect the community or that a program can be implemented which adequately supervises the person and addresses any risk the person may pose to the community.

HISTORY:

Added 2005, No. 192 (Adj. Sess.), § 10; amended 2007, No. 77, § 11.

§ 3272.
Community reentry; prerelease planning.

Consistent with 28 V.S.A. § 721, the Department of Corrections shall jointly establish with the community of planned residence a community reentry support team for all offenders designated as high risk under section 5411b of this title. The Department, the reentry support team, and the offender shall jointly begin developing a release plan for each offender subject to this subsection beginning at least 12 months prior to the offender’s release. The Department shall designate a person to oversee the creation of prerelease plans developed under this section and to review completed plans.

A release plan developed under this section shall be individually tailored for each offender, shall describe in detail the community reentry programming planned for the offender, and shall include provisions addressing:

the appropriate residence for the offender;

postrelease treatment;

the community support and accountability network available to the offender; and

potential employment for the offender, including job and skills training.

A release plan developed under this section shall include a plan for victim safety developed jointly by the Department and any known victim desiring to participate. A plan developed pursuant to this subsection shall include victim wraparound services when practicable and desired by the victim.

Notwithstanding the provisions of 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, the Department shall develop an internal directive to implement the provisions of this section.

This section shall not be construed to affect in any way the Department’s duty to develop and implement plans for offenders to return to the community under 28 V.S.A. § 1(b).

HISTORY:

Added 2005, No. 192 (Adj. Sess.), § 14.

§§ 3273-3280.
[Reserved for future use.]

§ 3281.
Sexual assault survivors’ rights.

Short title. This section may be cited as the “Bill of Rights for Sexual Assault Survivors.”

Definition. As used in this section, “sexual assault survivor” means a person who is a victim of an alleged sexual offense.

Survivors’ rights. When a sexual assault survivor makes a verbal or written report to a law enforcement officer, emergency department, sexual assault nurse examiner, or victim’s advocate of an alleged sexual offense, the recipient of the report shall provide written notification to the survivor that he or she has the following rights:

The right to receive a medical forensic examination and any related toxicology testing at no cost to the survivor in accordance with 32 V.S.A. § 1407, irrespective of whether the survivor reports to or cooperates with law enforcement. If the survivor opts to have a medical forensic examination, he or she shall have the following additional rights:

the right to have the medical forensic examination kit or its probative contents delivered to a forensics laboratory within 72 hours of collection;

the right to have the sexual assault evidence collection kit or its probative contents preserved without charge for the duration of the maximum applicable statute of limitations;

the right to be informed in writing of all policies governing the collection, storage, preservation, and disposal of a sexual assault evidence collection kit;

the right to be informed of a DNA profile match on a kit reported to law enforcement or on a confidential kit, on a toxicology report, or on a medical record documenting a medical forensic examination, if the disclosure would not impede or compromise an ongoing investigation; and

upon written request from the survivor, the right to:

receive written notification from the appropriate official with custody not later than 60 days before the date of the kit’s intended destruction or disposal; and

be granted further preservation of the kit or its probative contents.

The right to consult with a sexual assault advocate.

The right to information concerning the availability of protective orders and policies related to the enforcement of protective orders.

The right to information about the availability of, and eligibility for, victim compensation and restitution.

The right to information about confidentiality.

Notification protocols. The Vermont Network Against Domestic and Sexual Violence and the Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner Program, in consultation with other parties referred to in this section, shall develop protocols and written materials to assist all responsible entities in providing notification to victims.

HISTORY:

Added 2017, No. 44, § 4.